NLP 2017/HW4_foma/turc.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Inf

LEXICON Root

Verb;

LEXICON Verb

yaz Suff;
yazɪl Suff;
bur Suff;
burul Suff;
giy Suff;
giyin Suff;
seviş Suff;
görün Suff;
görüş Suff;
öpüş Suff;
doğ Suff;
doğur Suff;
bat Suff;
piş Suff;
pişir Suff;
geҫ Suff;
düş Suff;
tut Suff;

LEXICON Suff

+Inf:^k #;
